North Dakota, session 69, HB1529.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 15-10-19.1 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. A "resident student" for tuition purposes means:
a. An individual whose guardian, custodial parent, or parents are legal residents of this
state and have resided in this state for twelve months, or a dependent child whose
custodial parent moved into the state with the intent to establish legal residency for a
period of years within the last twelve months immediately prior to the beginning of the
academic term;
b. An individual of age eighteen or over who is a legal resident of this state and has resided
in this state after reaching age eighteen for twelve months immediately prior to the
beginning of the academic term;
c. An individual who graduated from a North Dakota high school;
d. (1) A full-time active duty member of the armed forces;
(2) A member of the national guard;
(3) A member of the armed forces reserve component; or
(4) A veteran, as defined in section 37-01-40;
e. A benefited employee of the North Dakota university system;
f. The spouse of:
(1) A full-time active duty member of the armed forces;
(2) A member of the national guard;
(3) A member of the armed forces reserve component;
(4) A veteran, as defined in section 37-01-40, including a veteran eligible to transfer
entitlement under the Post 9-11 Veterans Educational Assistance Act of 2008 [38
U.S.C. 3301];
(5) A benefited employee of the North Dakota university system; or
(6) Any other individual who is a resident for tuition purposes;
g. A dependent of:
(1) A full-time active duty member of the armed forces;

H. B. NO. 1529 - PAGE 2
(2) A member of the national guard;
(3) A member of the armed forces reserve component;
(4) A veteran, as defined in section 37-01-40, including a veteran eligible to transfer
entitlement under the Post 9-11 Veterans Educational Assistance Act of 2008
[38 U.S.C. 3301]; or
(5) A benefited employee of the North Dakota university system;
h. An individual who was a legal resident of this state for at least three consecutive years
within six years of the beginning of the academic term;
i. A child, spouse, widow, or widower of a veteran as defined in section 37-01-40 who was
killed in action or died from wounds or other service-connected causes, was totally
disabled as a result of service-connected causes, died from service-connected
disabilities, was a prisoner of war, or was declared missing in action; or
j. A covered individual as defined by section 702 of Public Law No. 113-146 [128 Stat.
1797; 38 U.S.C. 3679]; or
k. An individual certified by a director of the peace corps as having completed service as a
peace corps volunteer.

H. B. NO. 1529 - PAGE 3
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1529.
House Vote: Yeas 88 Nays 0 Absent 6
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State